Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 2. Creation, Revocation, and Amendment of Power of Appointment.

§ 64.2-2707.
Creation of power of appointment.

A power of appointment is created only if:

The instrument creating the power:

Is valid under applicable law; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsection B, transfers the appointive property; and

Subdivision A 1 b does not apply to the creation of a power of appointment by the exercise of a power of appointment.

A power of appointment may not be created in a deceased individual.

Subject to an applicable rule against perpetuities, a power of appointment may be created in an unborn or unascertained powerholder.

2.

The terms of the instrument creating the power manifest the donor’s intent to create in a powerholder a power of appointment over the appointive property exercisable in favor of a permissible appointee.

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2708.
Nontransferability.

A powerholder may not transfer a power of appointment. If a powerholder dies without exercising or releasing a power, the power lapses.

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2709.
Presumption of unlimited authority.

Subject to §

64.2-2711

, and unless the terms of the instrument creating a power of appointment manifest a contrary intent, the power is:

Presently exercisable;

Exclusionary; and

Except as otherwise provided in §

64.2-2710

, general.

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2710.
Exception to presumption of unlimited authority.

Unless the terms of the instrument creating a power of appointment manifest a contrary intent, the power is nongeneral if:

The power is exercisable only at the powerholder’s death; and

The permissible appointees of the power do not include the powerholder’s estate, the powerholder’s creditors, or the creditors of the powerholder’s estate.

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2711.
Rules of classification.

As used in this section, “adverse party” means a person with a substantial beneficial interest in property which would be affected adversely by a powerholder’s exercise or nonexercise of a power of appointment in favor of the powerholder, the powerholder’s estate, a creditor of the powerholder, or a creditor of the powerholder’s estate.

If a powerholder may exercise a power of appointment only with the consent or joinder of an adverse party, the power is nongeneral.

Only a power of appointment whose permissible appointees are defined and limited can be nonexclusionary.

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2712.
Power to revoke or amend.

A donor may revoke or amend a power of appointment only to the extent that:

The instrument creating the power is revocable by the donor; or

The donor reserves a power of revocation or amendment in the instrument creating the power of appointment.

History.

2016, c. 266.